Illinois, session 104th, SB173.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 6-17 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/6-17)  (from Ch. 46, par. 6-17)7    Sec. 6-17. Dissolution. 8    (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), whenever 9Whenever 1,000 of the legal voters in a city of 250,000 10population or less where this Article 6 and Articles 14 and 18 11of this Act or the Act of which they are a continuation have 12been adopted shall petition the circuit court in the county in 13which such city is located to submit to a vote of the electors 14of such city the proposition as to whether such city and the 15electors thereof shall reject the Articles, the court shall 16enter an order of record approving such petition and thereupon 17the court shall submit such proposition to the legal voters of 18such city at the next succeeding general, state, county or 19municipal election to be held in such county in not less than 2030 days after the entry of such order. If 1,000 shall exceed 21one-eighth of the legal voters of any such city then such 22petition need not be signed or made by more than one-eighth of 23the legal voters of such city. Notice of election shall be   SB0173- 2 -LRB104 06588 SPS 16624 b1given by the court at least 20 days prior to such election by 2publication in one or more newspapers of general circulation 3published within such city.4    (b) The county board or board of county commissioners of a 5county with a population of less than 100,000 may, by 6ordinance or resolution, dissolve a municipal board of 7election commissioners within that county and transfer its 8functions to the county clerk. 9(Source: P.A. 83-1362.)